District of Columbia statutes.
37-201.25

Council may establish tolerances and specifications.

The Council of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized and empowered to establish tolerances and specifications for scales, weights, measures, weighing or measuring instruments or devices, and containers used in the District of Columbia. The Council shall prescribe and allow for barrels, containers, and packages, provided for in this subchapter the same specifications, variations, or tolerances that have been prescribed or established, or that may hereafter be prescribed or established for like barrels, containers, or packages by any officer of the United States in accordance with any requirement of an act of Congress.

Mar. 3, 1921, 41 Stat. 1224, ch. 118, § 25
1981 Ed., § 10-129.
1973 Ed., § 10-127.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(197) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Home Rule Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.